District of Columbia statutes.
3-1251.14

Reports to the Board.

The Board shall require reports from the Committee annually and at such other times as it believes may be necessary and appropriate. The reports shall include:

(1)

Information concerning the number of cases accepted, denied, and terminated, with compliance or noncompliance; and

(2)

A cost analysis of the Program.

May 1, 2001, D.C. Law 13-297, § 15, 48 DCR 2036
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-191, § 127, 53 DCR 6794
D.C. Law 16-191 validated a previously made technical correction.